Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB559.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Previously unlicensed location" shall mean a location that: (1) has never held a retail liquor license, importing distributor license or distributor license; or(2) previously held a retail liquor license, importing distributor license or distributor license which was not used for a subsequent non-license-related purpose for a period of at least three years. LOCATION: (1) AT WHICH A RESTAURANT, HOTEL, CLUB, RETAIL DISPENSER, IMPORTING DISTRIBUTOR OR DISTRIBUTOR LICENSE HAS NEVER BEEN ISSUED; OR(2) AT WHICH A RESTAURANT, HOTEL, CLUB, RETAIL DISPENSER, IMPORTING DISTRIBUTOR OR DISTRIBUTOR LICENSE HAS NOT BEEN USED WITHIN THE PREVIOUS THREE YEARS PRECEDING THE APPLICATION.* * *Section 2. Sections 402(a) and (b), 404(a), 431(b) and 432(d) and (e) of the act are amended to read:Section 402. License Districts; License Period; Hearings.--(a) The board shall hold hearings on applications for licenses and renewals thereof, as it deems necessary, at such times as it shall fix for the purpose of hearing testimony for and against applications for new licenses and renewals thereof. The board shall hold a hearing on any application for a new hotel, club or restaurant liquor license or the transfer of any such license to a [new] previously unlicensed location, upon the request of any person with standing to testify under subsection (b) if the 20250HB0559PN1697 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request is filed with the board within the first fifteen days of posting of the notice of application pursuant to section 403(g). The board may provide for the holding of such hearings by hearing examiners learned in the law, to be appointed by the Governor, who shall not be subject to the act of August 5, 1941 (P.L.752, No.286), known as the "Civil Service Act." Such hearing examiners shall make a report to the board in each case with their recommendations. The board may fix the license period for each separate license so that the expiration dates shall be staggered as to the State.(b) Where a hearing is held in the case of an application for a new hotel, club or restaurant liquor license or an application for the transfer of a hotel, club or restaurant liquor license to a [new] previously unlicensed location, the board shall permit residents residing within a radius of five hundred feet of the premises to testify at the hearing. The board and any hearing examiner thereof shall give appropriate evidentiary weight to any testimony of such residents given at the hearing.* * *Section 404. Issuance, Transfer or Extension of Hotel, Restaurant and Club Liquor Licenses.--(a) Upon receipt of the application and the proper fees, and upon being satisfied of the truth of the statements in the application that the applicant and management company or companies, if any, are the only persons in any manner pecuniarily interested in the business so asked to be licensed and that no other person will be in any manner pecuniarily interested therein during the continuance of the license, except as hereinafter permitted, and that the applicant is a person of good repute, that the premises applied 20250HB0559PN1697 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for meet all the requirements of this act and the regulations of the board, that the applicant seeks a license for a hotel, restaurant or club, as defined in this act, and that the issuance of such license is not prohibited by any of the provisions of this act, the board shall, in the case of a hotel or restaurant, grant and issue to the applicant a liquor license, and in the case of a club may, in its discretion, issue or refuse a license: Provided, however, That in the case of any new license or the transfer of any license to a [new] previously unlicensed location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area the board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse such new license, transfer or extension if such place proposed to be licensed is within three hundred feet of any church, hospital, charitable institution, school, or public playground, or if such new license, transfer or extension is applied for a place which is within two hundred feet of any other premises which is licensed by the board: And provided further, That the board's authority to refuse to grant a license because of its proximity to a church, hospital, charitable institution, public playground or other licensed premises shall not be applicable to license applications submitted for public venues or performing arts facilities: And provided further, That the board shall refuse any application for a new license, the transfer of any license to a [new] previously unlicensed location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area if, in the board's opinion, such new license, transfer or extension would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the place proposed to be licensed: And provided further, That the board shall have the 20250HB0559PN1697 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 discretion to refuse a license to any person or to any corporation, partnership or association if such person, or any officer or director of such corporation, or any member or partner of such partnership or association shall have been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the said license. The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question. If the board and the applicant enter into such an agreement, such agreement shall be binding on the applicant. Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 471 and for the nonrenewal of the license under section 470. If the board enters into an agreement with an applicant concerning additional restrictions, those restrictions shall be binding on subsequent holders of the license until the license is transferred to a [new] previously unlicensed location or until the board enters into a subsequent agreement removing those restrictions. If the application in question involves a location previously licensed by the board, then any restrictions imposed by the board on the previous license at that location shall be binding on the applicant unless the board enters into a new agreement rescinding those restrictions. The board may, in its discretion, refuse an application for an economic development license under section 461(b.1) or an application for an intermunicipal transfer of a license if the board receives a protest from the governing body of the receiving municipality. The receiving municipality of an intermunicipal transfer or an economic development license under section 461(b.1) may file a protest against the transfer of a license into its municipality, 20250HB0559PN1697 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the receiving municipality shall have standing in a hearing to present testimony in support of or against the issuance or transfer of a license. Upon any opening in any quota, an application for a new license shall only be filed with the board for a period of six months following said opening.* * *Section 431. Malt and Brewed Beverages Manufacturers', Distributors' and Importing Distributors' Licenses.--* * *(b) The board shall issue to any reputable person who applies therefor, and pays the license fee hereinafter prescribed, a distributor's or importing distributor's license for the place which such person desires to maintain for the sale of malt or brewed beverages, not for consumption on the premises where sold, and in quantities of not less than a case or original containers containing one hundred twenty-eight ounces or more which may be sold separately as prepared for the market by the manufacturer at the place of manufacture. In addition, a distributor license holder may sell malt or brewed beverages in any amount to a person not licensed by the board for off-premises consumption. The sales shall not be required to be in the package configuration designated by the manufacturer and may be sold in refillable growlers. The board shall have the discretion to refuse a license to any person or to any corporation, partnership or association if such person, or any officer or director of such corporation, or any member or partner of such partnership or association shall have been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the said license: And provided further, That, in the case of any new license or the transfer of any license to a [new] previously 20250HB0559PN1697 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unlicensed location, the board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse such new license or transfer if such place proposed to be licensed is within three hundred feet of any church, hospital, charitable institution, school or public playground, or if such new license or transfer is applied for a place which is within two hundred feet of any other premises which is licensed by the board: And provided further, That the board shall refuse any application for a new license or the transfer of any license to a [new] previously unlicensed location if, in the board's opinion, such new license or transfer would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the place proposed to be licensed. The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question. If the board and the applicant enter into such an agreement, such agreement shall be binding on the applicant. Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 471 and for the nonrenewal of the license under section 470. If the board enters into an agreement with an applicant concerning additional restrictions, those restrictions shall be binding on subsequent holders of the license until the license is transferred to a [new] previously unlicensed location or until the board enters into a subsequent agreement removing those restrictions. If the application in question involves a location previously licensed by the board, then any restrictions imposed by the board on the previous license at that location shall be binding on the applicant unless the board enters into a new agreement rescinding those restrictions. The board shall require notice to be posted on the property or premises upon 20250HB0559PN1697 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which the licensee or proposed licensee will engage in sales of malt or brewed beverages. This notice shall be similar to the notice required of hotel, restaurant and club liquor licensees.Except as hereinafter provided, such license shall authorize the holder thereof to sell or deliver malt or brewed beverages in quantities above specified anywhere within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, which, in the case of distributors, have been purchased only from persons licensed under this act as manufacturers or importing distributors, and in the case of importing distributors, have been purchased from manufacturers or persons outside this Commonwealth engaged in the legal sale of malt or brewed beverages or from manufacturers or importing distributors licensed under this article. In the case of an importing distributor, the holder of such a license shall be authorized to store and repackage malt or brewed beverages owned by a manufacturer at a segregated portion of a warehouse or other storage facility authorized by section 441(d) and operated by the importing distributor within its appointed territory and deliver such beverages to another importing distributor who has been granted distribution rights by the manufacturer as provided herein. The importing distributor shall be permitted to receive a fee from the manufacturer for any related storage, repackaging or delivery services. In the case of a bailee for hire hired by a manufacturer, the holder of such a permit shall be authorized: to receive, store and repackage malt or brewed beverages produced by that manufacturer for sale by that manufacturer to importing distributors to whom that manufacturer has given distribution rights pursuant to this subsection or to purchasers outside this Commonwealth for delivery outside this Commonwealth; or to ship to that manufacturer's storage 20250HB0559PN1697 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities outside this Commonwealth. The bailee for hire shall be permitted to receive a fee from the manufacturer for any related storage, repackaging or delivery services. The bailee for hire shall, as required in Article V of this act, keep complete and accurate records of all transactions, inventory, receipts and shipments and make all records and the licensed areas available for inspection by the board and for the Pennsylvania State Police, Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement, during normal business hours.Each out of State manufacturer of malt or brewed beverages whose products are sold and delivered in this Commonwealth shall give distributing rights for such products in designated geographical areas to specific importing distributors, and such importing distributor shall not sell or deliver malt or brewed beverages manufactured by the out of State manufacturer to any person issued a license under the provisions of this act whose licensed premises are not located within the geographical area for which he has been given distributing rights by such manufacturer. In addition, the holder of a distributor license may not sell or deliver malt or brewed beverages to any licensee whose licensed premises is located within the designated geographical area granted to an importing distributor other than the importing distributor that sold the malt or brewed beverages to the distributor. If the licensee purchasing the malt or brewed beverages from the distributor license holder holds multiple licenses or operates at more than one location, then the malt or brewed beverages may not be consumed or sold at licensed premises located within the designated geographical area granted to an importing distributor other than the importing distributor that sold the malt or brewed beverages to 20250HB0559PN1697 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the distributor. Should a licensee accept the delivery of malt or brewed beverages or transfer malt or brewed beverages in violation of this section, said licensee shall be subject to a suspension of his license for at least thirty days: Provided, That the importing distributor holding such distributing rights for such product shall not sell or deliver the same to another importing distributor without first having entered into a written agreement with the said secondary importing distributor setting forth the terms and conditions under which such products are to be resold within the territory granted to the primary importing distributor by the manufacturer.When a Pennsylvania manufacturer of malt or brewed beverages licensed under this article names or constitutes a distributor or importing distributor as the primary or original supplier of his product, he shall also designate the specific geographical area for which the said distributor or importing distributor is given distributing rights, and such distributor or importing distributor shall not sell or deliver the products of such manufacturer to any person issued a license under the provisions of this act whose licensed premises are not located within the geographical area for which distributing rights have been given to the distributor and importing distributor by the said manufacturer. In addition, the holder of a distributor license may not sell or deliver malt or brewed beverages to a licensee whose licensed premises is located within the designated geographical area granted to an importing distributor other than the importing distributor that sold the malt or brewed beverages to the distributor. If the licensee purchasing the malt or brewed beverages from the distributor license holder holds multiple licenses or operates at more than one location, the 20250HB0559PN1697 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 malt or brewed beverages may not be consumed or sold at licensed premises located within the designated geographical area granted to an importing distributor other than the importing distributor that sold the malt or brewed beverages to the distributor. If a licensee accepts the delivery of malt or brewed beverages or transfers malt or brewed beverages in violation of this section, the licensee shall be subject to suspension of his license for at least thirty days: Provided, That the importing distributor holding such distributing rights for such product shall not sell or deliver the same to another importing distributor without first having entered into a written agreement with the said secondary importing distributor setting forth the terms and conditions under which such products are to be resold within the territory granted to the primary importing distributor by the manufacturer. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent any manufacturer from authorizing the importing distributor holding the distributing rights for a designated geographical area from selling the products of such manufacturer to another importing distributor also holding distributing rights from the same manufacturer for another geographical area, providing such authority be contained in writing and a copy thereof be given to each of the importing distributors so affected.* * *Section 432. Malt and Brewed Beverages Retail Licenses.--* * *(d) The board shall, in its discretion, grant or refuse any new license, the transfer of any license to a [new] previously unlicensed location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area if such place proposed to be licensed 20250HB0559PN1697 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is within three hundred feet of any church, hospital, charitable institution, school, or public playground, or if such new license, transfer or extension is applied for a place which is within two hundred feet of any other premises which is licensed by the board. The board shall refuse any application for a new license, the transfer of any license to a [new] previously unlicensed location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area if, in the board's opinion, such new license, transfer or extension would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the place to be licensed. The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question. If the board and the applicant enter into such an agreement, such agreement shall be binding on the applicant. Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 471 and for the nonrenewal of the license under section 470. If the board enters into an agreement with an applicant concerning additional restrictions, those restrictions shall be binding on subsequent holders of the license until the license is transferred to a [new] previously unlicensed location or until the board enters into a subsequent agreement removing those restrictions. If the application in question involves a location previously licensed by the board, then any restrictions imposed by the board on the previous license at that location shall be binding on the applicant unless the board enters into a new agreement rescinding those restrictions. The board shall have the discretion to refuse a license to any person or to any corporation, partnership or association if such person, or any 20250HB0559PN1697 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officer or director of such corporation, or any member or partner of such partnership or association shall have been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the said license. The board may, in its discretion, refuse an application for an economic development license under section 461(b.1) or an application for an intermunicipal transfer or a license if the board receives a protest from the governing body of the receiving municipality. The receiving municipality of an intermunicipal transfer or an economic development license under section 461(b.1) may file a protest against the approval for issuance of a license for economic development or an intermunicipal transfer of a license into its municipality, and such municipality shall have standing in a hearing to present testimony in support of or against the issuance or transfer of a license. Upon any opening in any quota, an application for a new license shall only be filed with the board for a period of six months following said opening.(e) Every applicant for a new or for the transfer of an existing license to another premises not then licensed shall post, for a period of at least thirty days beginning with the day the application is filed with the board, in a conspicuous place on the outside of the premises or in a window plainly visible from the outside of the premises for which the license is applied or at the proposed [new] previously unlicensed location, a notice of such application. The notice shall indicate whether the applicant is applying for the amusement permit required by section 493(10). The notice shall be in such form, be of such size, and contain such provisions as the board may require by its regulations. Proof of the posting of such 20250HB0559PN1697 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice shall be filed with the board.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0559PN1697 - 14 - 123